Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-6,265
Occupant protection system and three-point safety belt system, defined.

For purposes of sections 60-6,266 to 60-6,273:

(1) Occupant protection system means a system utilizing a lap belt, a shoulder belt, or any combination of belts installed in a motor vehicle which (a) restrains drivers and passengers and (b) conforms to Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards, 49 C.F.R. 571.207, 571.208, 571.209, and 571.210, as such standards existed on the date specified in section 60-201, or, as a minimum standard, to the federal motor vehicle safety standards for passenger restraint systems applicable for the motor vehicle's model year; and

(2) Three-point safety belt system means a system utilizing a combination of a lap belt and a shoulder belt installed in a motor vehicle which restrains drivers and passengers.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 361;

Laws 2004, LB 227, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 19;

Laws 2007, LB239, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 21;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 33;

Laws 2018, LB42, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 19;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 68;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 18;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 71;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 45;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 53;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 51.